California statutes. Water Code
(b) Historical patterns of precipitation are predicted to change, with two major implications for water supply. First, an increasing amount of California’s water is predicted to fall not as snow in the mountains, but as rain in other areas of the state. This will likely have a profound and transforming effect on California’s hydrologic cycle and much of that water will no longer be captured by California’s reservoirs, many of which are located to capture snowmelt. Second, runoff resulting from snowmelt is predicted to occur progressively earlier in the year, and reservoirs operated for flood control purposes must release water early in the season to protect against later storms, thereby reducing the amount of early season snowmelt that can be stored.

(c) Rainwater and stormwater, captured and properly managed, can contribute
 significantly to local water supplies by infiltrating and recharging groundwater aquifers, thereby increasing available supplies of drinking water. In addition, the onsite capture, storage,
 and use of rainwater for nonpotable uses significantly reduces demand for potable water, contributing to the statutory objective of a 20-percent reduction in urban per capita water use in California by December 31, 2020.

(d) Expanding opportunities for rainwater capture to augment water supply will require efforts at all levels, from individual landowners to state and local agencies and watershed managers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1750)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10572.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to do any of the following:

(a) Alter or impair any existing rights.

(b) Change existing water rights law.

(c) Authorize a landscape contractor to engage in or perform activities that require a license pursuant to the Professional Engineers Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).

(d) Impair the authority of the California Building Standards Commission to adopt and
 implement building standards for rainwater capture systems pursuant to existing law.

(e) Affect use of rainwater on agricultural lands.

(f) Impair the authority of a water supplier pursuant to Subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1750)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10573.

Solely for the purposes of this part, and unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Developed or developing lands” means lands that have one or more of the characteristics described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 56375.3 of the Government Code.

(b) “Rain barrel system” is a type of rainwater capture system that does not use electricity or a water pump and is not connected to or reliant on a potable water system.

(c) “Rainwater” means precipitation on any public or private parcel that has not
 entered an offsite storm drain system or channel, a flood control channel, or any other stream channel, and has not previously been put to beneficial use.

(d) “Rainwater capture system” means a facility designed to capture, retain, and store rainwater flowing off a building rooftop for subsequent onsite use.

(e) “Stormwater” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10561.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 6.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10574.

Use of rainwater collected from rooftops does not require a water right permit pursuant to Section 1201.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1750)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. SOUTH FORK AMERICAN RIVER [10600. - 10607.]

10600.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is an increasing conflict between water development projects and instream beneficial uses such as rafting, swimming, and fishing on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and the Salmon Falls Bridge. The Legislature further finds and declares that the state should make reasonable efforts to find solutions to this conflict which will satisfy local water needs while continuing instream beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

Where a potentially economically viable water supply development on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and the Salmon Falls Bridge which will meet local water needs would eliminate or substantially impair significant instream beneficial uses of water, the department may undertake cooperative studies with equal state-local cost sharing to determine whether there is an alternative solution which will meet the local water needs from a different source or location and which will preserve most or all of the instream beneficial uses on that part of the south fork.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

The department, with regard to the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and the Salmon Falls Bridge, may recommend to the Legislature that state financial assistance be provided (1) where it is necessary to make the alternative solution financially attractive to the local area compared to the development which would eliminate or substantially impair the significant instream beneficial uses, and (2) where the value of the instream beneficial uses that would be preserved are greater than the proposed state financial assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

In undertaking studies pursuant to this part, the department shall take into consideration the potential necessity to produce hydroelectric energy to pay for future water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

The department shall undertake cooperative studies pursuant to this part for the following:

(a) The Georgetown Divide Public Utility District and the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.

Where the state provides financial assistance to implement or assist in the implementation of an alternative solution, the State Water Resources Control Board, in considering a subsequent permit or license to be issued for a project on the stretch of river where the preserved instream beneficial uses occur, shall give great weight to the preservation of the instream beneficial uses preserved as a result of the state financial assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.

If the instream beneficial uses on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and the Salmon Falls Bridge preserved by the state financial assistance will be reduced by a subsequent permit or license issued for a project on the stretch of river where the preserved instream beneficial uses occur, the board shall require as a condition of issuance of the permit or license that the recipient repay the amount of the state assistance, or proportionate amounts thereof as determined by the board, including interest at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account to the fund from which the financial assistance was appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.

The Legislature finds and declares that the circumstances which resulted in the enactment of this part are unique and therefore this part shall not be considered a precedent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.55. SUSTAINABLE WATER USE AND DEMAND REDUCTION [10608. - 10609.42.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Declarations and Policy [10608. - 10608.8.]

10608.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Water is a public resource that the California Constitution protects against waste and unreasonable use.

(b) Growing population, climate change, and the need to protect and grow California’s economy while protecting and restoring our fish and wildlife habitats make it essential that the state manage its water resources as efficiently as possible.

(c) Diverse regional water supply portfolios will increase water supply reliability and reduce dependence on the Delta.

(d) Reduced water use through conservation provides significant energy and environmental benefits, and can help protect water quality, improve streamflows, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(e) The success of state and local water conservation programs to increase efficiency of water use is best determined on the basis of measurable outcomes related to water use or efficiency.

(f) Improvements in technology and management practices offer the potential for increasing water efficiency in California over time, providing an essential water management tool to meet the need for water for urban, agricultural, and environmental uses.

(g) The Governor has called for a 20 percent per capita reduction in urban water use statewide by 2020.

(h) The
 factors used to formulate water use efficiency targets can vary significantly from location to location based on factors including weather, patterns of urban and suburban development, and past efforts to enhance water use efficiency.

(i) Per capita water use is a valid measure of a water provider’s efforts to reduce urban water use within its service area. However, per capita water use is less useful for measuring relative water use efficiency between different water providers. Differences in weather, historical patterns of urban and suburban development, and density of housing in a particular location need to be considered when assessing per capita water use as a measure of efficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature, by the enactment of this part, to do all of the following:

(a) Require all water suppliers to increase the efficiency of use of this essential resource.

(b) Establish a framework to meet the state targets for urban water conservation identified in this part and called for by the Governor.

(c) Measure increased efficiency of urban water use on a per capita basis.

(d) Establish a method or methods for urban retail water suppliers to determine targets for achieving increased water use efficiency
 by the year 2020, in accordance with the Governor’s goal of a 20-percent reduction.

(e) Establish consistent water use efficiency planning and implementation standards for urban water suppliers and agricultural water suppliers.

(f) Promote urban water conservation standards that are consistent with the California Urban Water Conservation Council’s adopted best management practices and the requirements for demand management in Section 10631.

(g) Establish standards that recognize and provide credit to water suppliers that made substantial capital investments in urban water conservation since the drought of the early 1990s.

(h) Recognize and account for the investment of urban retail water suppliers in providing recycled water for beneficial uses.

(i) Require implementation of specified efficient water management practices for agricultural water suppliers.

(j) Support the economic productivity of California’s agricultural, commercial, and industrial sectors.

(k) Advance regional water resources management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.8.

(a) (1) Water use efficiency measures adopted and implemented pursuant to this part or Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800) are water conservation measures subject to the protections provided under Section 1011.

(2) Because an urban agency is not required to meet its urban water use target until 2020 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10608.24, an urban retail water supplier’s failure to meet those targets shall not establish a violation of law for purposes of any state administrative or judicial proceeding prior to January 1, 2021. Nothing in this paragraph limits the use of data reported to the department or the board in litigation or an administrative proceeding.
 This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2021.

(3) To the extent feasible, the department and the board shall provide for the use of water conservation reports required under this part to meet the requirements of Section 1011 for water conservation reporting.

(b) This part does not limit or otherwise affect the application of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) This part does not require a reduction in the total water used in the agricultural or urban sectors, because other factors, including, but not limited to, changes in agricultural economics or population growth may have greater effects on water
 use. This part does not limit the economic productivity of California’s agricultural, commercial, or industrial sectors.

(d) The requirements of this part do not apply to an agricultural water supplier that is a party to the Quantification Settlement Agreement, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Chapter 617 of the Statutes of 2002, during the period within which the Quantification Settlement Agreement remains in effect. After the expiration of the Quantification Settlement Agreement, to the extent conservation water projects implemented as part of the Quantification Settlement Agreement remain in effect, the conserved water created as part of those projects shall be credited against the obligations of the agricultural water supplier pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10608.12. - 10608.12.]

10608.12.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Affordable housing” has the same meaning as defined in Section 34191.30 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Agricultural water supplier” means a water supplier, either publicly or privately owned, providing water to 10,000 or more
 irrigated acres, excluding recycled water. “Agricultural water supplier” includes a supplier or contractor for water, regardless of the basis of right, that distributes or sells water for ultimate resale to customers. “Agricultural water supplier” does not include the department.

(c) “Base daily per capita water use” means any of the following:

(1) The urban retail water supplier’s estimate of its average gross water use, reported in gallons per capita per day and calculated over a continuous 10-year period ending no earlier than December 31, 2004, and no later than December 31, 2010.

(2) For an urban retail water supplier that meets at least 10 percent of its 2008 measured retail water demand through recycled
 water that is delivered within the service area of an urban retail water supplier or its urban wholesale water supplier, the urban retail water supplier may extend the calculation described in paragraph (1) up to an additional five years to a maximum of a continuous 15-year period ending no earlier than December 31, 2004, and no later than December 31, 2010.

(3) For the purposes of Section 10608.22, the urban retail water supplier’s estimate of its average gross water use, reported in gallons per capita per day and calculated over a continuous five-year period ending no earlier than December 31, 2007, and no later than December 31, 2010.

(d) “Baseline commercial, industrial, and institutional water use” means an urban retail water supplier’s base daily per capita water use
 for commercial, industrial, and institutional users.

(e) “CII water use” means water used by commercial water users, industrial water users, institutional water users, and large landscape water users.

(f) “Commercial water user” means a water user that provides or distributes a product or service.

(g) “Common area” means that portion of a common interest development or of a property owned or managed by a homeowners’ association or a community service organization or similar entity that is not assigned or allocated to the exclusive use of the occupants of an individual dwelling unit within the property.

(h) “Common interest development” has the same meaning as in Section 4100 of the Civil Code.

(i) “Community service organization or similar entity” has the same meaning as in Section 4110 of the Civil Code.

(j) “Community space” means an area designated by a property owner or a governmental agency to accommodate human foot
 traffic for civic, ceremonial, or other community events or social gatherings. 

(k) “Compliance daily per capita water use” means the gross water use during the final year of the reporting period, reported in gallons per capita per day.

(l) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with an annual median household income that is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income.

(m) “Functional turf” means a ground cover surface of turf located in a recreational use area or community space. Turf enclosed by fencing or other barriers to permanently preclude human access for recreation or assembly is not functional turf.

(n) “Gross water use” means the total volume of water, whether treated or untreated, entering the distribution system of an urban retail water supplier, excluding all of the following:

(1) Recycled water that is delivered within the service area of an urban retail water supplier or its urban wholesale water supplier.

(2) The net volume of water that the urban retail water supplier places into long-term storage.

(3) The volume of water the urban retail water supplier conveys for use by another urban water supplier.

(4) The volume of water delivered for agricultural use, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f) of Section 10608.24.

(o) “Homeowners’ association” means an “association” as defined in Section 4080 of the Civil Code.

(p) “Industrial water user” means a water user that is primarily a manufacturer or processor of materials as defined by the North American Industry Classification System code sectors 31 to 33, inclusive, or an entity that is a water user primarily engaged in research and development.

(q) “Institutional water user” means a water user dedicated to public service. This type of user includes, among other users, higher education institutions, schools, courts, churches, hospitals, government facilities, and nonprofit research institutions.

(r) “Interim urban water use
 target” means the midpoint between the urban retail water supplier’s base daily per capita water use and the urban retail water supplier’s urban water use target for 2020.

(s) “Large landscape” means a nonresidential landscape as described in the performance measures for CII water use adopted pursuant to Section 10609.10.

(t) “Locally cost effective” means that the present value of the local benefits of implementing an agricultural efficiency water management practice is greater than or equal to the present value of the local cost of implementing that measure.

(u) “Nonfunctional turf” means any turf that is not functional turf, and includes turf located within street rights-of-way and parking lots.

(v) “Performance measures” means actions to be taken by urban retail water suppliers that will result in increased water use efficiency by CII water users. Performance measures may include, but are not limited to, educating CII water users on best management practices, conducting water use audits, and preparing
 water management plans. Performance measures do not include process water.

(w) “Potable reuse” means direct potable reuse, indirect potable reuse for groundwater recharge, and reservoir water augmentation as those terms are defined in Section 13561.

(x) “Potable water” means
 water that is suitable for human consumption.

(y) “Process water” means water used by industrial water users for producing a product or product content or water used for research and development. Process water includes, but is not limited to, continuous manufacturing processes, and water used for testing, cleaning, and maintaining equipment. Water used to cool machinery or buildings used in the manufacturing process or necessary to maintain product quality or chemical characteristics for product manufacturing or control rooms, data centers, laboratories, clean rooms, and other
 industrial facility units that are integral to the manufacturing or research and development process is process water. Water used in the manufacturing process that is necessary for complying with local, state, and federal health and safety laws, and is not incidental water, is process water. Process water does not mean incidental water uses.

(z) “Public water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(aa) “Recreational use area” means an area designated by a property owner or a governmental agency to accommodate human foot traffic for recreation, including, but not limited to, sports fields, golf courses, playgrounds, picnic grounds, or pet exercise areas. This recreation may be either formal or informal.

(ab) “Recycled water” means recycled water, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 13050.

(ac) “Regional water resources management” means sources of supply resulting from watershed-based planning for sustainable local water reliability or any of the following alternative sources of water:

(1) The capture and reuse of stormwater or rainwater.

(2) The use of recycled water.

(3) The desalination of brackish groundwater.

(4) The conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater in a manner that is consistent with the safe yield of the groundwater basin.

(ad) “Reporting period” means the years for which an urban retail water supplier reports compliance with the urban water use targets.

(ae) “Turf” has the same meaning as defined in Section 491 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(af) “Urban retail water supplier” means a water supplier, either publicly or privately owned, that directly provides potable municipal water to more than 3,000 end users or that supplies more than 3,000 acre-feet of potable water annually at retail for municipal purposes.

(ag) “Urban water supplier” has the same meaning as defined
 in Section 10617.

(ah) “Urban water use objective” means an estimate of aggregate efficient water use for the previous year based on adopted water use efficiency standards and local service area characteristics for that year, as described in Section 10609.20.

(ai) “Urban water use target” means the urban retail water supplier’s targeted future daily per capita water use.

(aj) “Urban wholesale water supplier” means a water supplier, either publicly or privately owned, that provides more than 3,000 acre-feet of water annually at wholesale for potable municipal purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 849, Sec. 3.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Nonfunctional Turf  [10608.14. - 10608.14.]

10608.14.

(a) The use of potable water for the irrigation of nonfunctional turf located on commercial, industrial, and institutional properties, other than a cemetery, and on properties of homeowners’ associations, common interest developments, and community service organizations or similar entities is prohibited as of the following dates:

(1) All properties owned by the Department of General Services, beginning January 1, 2027.

(2) All properties owned by local governments, local or regional public agencies, and public water systems, except those specified in paragraph (5), beginning January 1, 2027.

(3) All other institutional properties and all commercial and industrial properties, beginning January 1, 2028.

(4) All common areas of properties of homeowners’ associations, common interest developments, and community service organizations or similar entities, beginning January 1, 2029.

(5) All properties owned by local governments, local public agencies, and public water systems in a disadvantaged community, beginning January 1, 2031, or the date upon which a state funding source is made available to fund conversion of nonfunctional turf on these properties to climate-appropriate landscapes, whichever is later.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the use of
 potable water is not prohibited by this section to the extent necessary to ensure the health of trees and other perennial nonturf plantings, or to the extent necessary to address an immediate health and safety need.

(c) The board may, upon a showing of good cause for reasons including economic hardship, critical business need, and potential impacts to human health or safety, postpone a compliance deadline
 in subdivision (a) by up to three years for certain persons, institutions, and businesses, and may create a form to be used for compliance certification to the board by property owners.

(d) Public water systems shall, by no later than January 1, 2027, revise their regulations, ordinances, or policies governing water service to include the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), as revised by the board pursuant to subdivision (c), and shall communicate the requirements to their customers on or before that date.

(e) (1) An owner of commercial, industrial, or institutional property with more than 5,000 square feet of irrigated area other
 than a cemetery shall certify to the board, commencing June 30, 2030, and every three years thereafter through 2039, that their property is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) An owner of a property with more than 5,000 square feet of irrigated common area that is a homeowners’ association, common interest development, or community service organization or similar entity shall certify to the board, commencing June 30, 2031, and every three years thereafter through 2040, that their property is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(f) Noncompliance by a person or entity with this chapter or regulations adopted thereunder shall be subject to civil liability and penalties set forth in Section 1846, or to civil liability and penalties
 imposed by an urban retail water supplier pursuant to a locally adopted ordinance or policy.

(g) (1) A public water system, city, county, or city and county may enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(2) To avoid duplication of enforcement, any entity identified in paragraph (1) that is not a retail public water system shall notify the retail public water system 30 days prior to enforcement of the provisions of this chapter against a property served by such system.

(3) Nothing in paragraph (2) shall preclude enforcement by any entity identified in paragraph (1) once adequate notice is given.

(h) The department shall, when using funds appropriated for water
 conservation for turf replacement, prioritize financial assistance for nonfunctional turf replacement to public water systems serving disadvantaged communities and to owners of affordable housing.

(i) The department shall utilize the saveourwater.com internet website and outreach campaign to provide information and resources on converting nonfunctional turf to native vegetation.

(j) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall support small and minority-owned businesses that provide services that advance compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 849, Sec. 4.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Urban Retail Water Suppliers [10608.16. - 10608.44.]

10608.16.

(a) The state shall achieve a 20-percent reduction in urban per capita water use in California on or before December 31, 2020.

(b) The state shall make incremental progress towards the state target specified in subdivision (a) by reducing urban per capita water use by at least 10 percent on or before December 31, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.20.

(a) (1) Each urban retail water supplier shall develop urban water use targets and an interim urban water use target by July 1, 2011. Urban retail water suppliers may elect to determine and report progress toward achieving these targets on an individual or regional basis, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 10608.28, and may determine the targets on a fiscal year or calendar year basis.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the urban water use targets described in paragraph (1) cumulatively result in a 20-percent reduction from the baseline daily per capita water use by December 31, 2020.

(b) An urban retail water supplier shall adopt one of the following methods
 for determining its urban water use target pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Eighty percent of the urban retail water supplier’s baseline per capita daily water use.

(2) The per capita daily water use that is estimated using the sum of the following performance standards:

(A) For indoor residential water use, 55 gallons per capita daily water use as a provisional standard. Upon completion of the department’s 2017 report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 10608.42, this standard may be adjusted by the Legislature by statute.

(B) For landscape irrigated through dedicated or residential meters or connections, water efficiency equivalent to the standards of the Model Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance set forth in Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section
 490) of Division 2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, as in effect the later of the year of the landscape’s installation or 1992. An urban retail water supplier using the approach specified in this subparagraph shall use satellite imagery, site visits, or other best available technology to develop an accurate estimate of landscaped areas.

(C) For commercial, industrial, and institutional uses, a 10-percent reduction in water use from the baseline commercial, industrial, and institutional water use by 2020.

(3) Ninety-five percent of the applicable state hydrologic region target, as set forth in the state’s draft 20x2020 Water Conservation Plan (dated April 30, 2009). If the service area of an urban water supplier includes more than one hydrologic region, the supplier shall apportion its service area to each region based on population or area.

(4) A method that shall be identified and developed by the department, through a public process, and reported to the Legislature no later than December 31, 2010. The method developed by the department shall identify per capita targets that cumulatively result in a statewide 20-percent reduction in urban daily per capita water use by December 31, 2020. In developing urban daily per capita water use targets, the department shall do all of the following:

(A) Consider climatic differences within the state.

(B) Consider population density differences within the state.

(C) Provide flexibility to communities and regions in meeting the targets.

(D) Consider different levels of per capita water use
 according to plant water needs in different regions.

(E) Consider different levels of commercial, industrial, and institutional water use in different regions of the state.

(F) Avoid placing an undue hardship on communities that have implemented conservation measures or taken actions to keep per capita water use low.

(c) If the department adopts a regulation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) that results in a requirement that an urban retail water supplier achieve a reduction in daily per capita water use that is greater than 20 percent by December 31, 2020, an urban retail water supplier that adopted the method described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) may limit its urban water use target to a reduction of not more than 20 percent by December 31, 2020, by adopting the method described in paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (b).

(d) The department shall update the method described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) and report to the Legislature by December 31, 2014. An urban retail water supplier that adopted the method described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) may adopt a new urban daily per capita water use target pursuant to this updated method.

(e) An urban retail water supplier shall include in its urban water management plan due in 2010 pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) the baseline daily per capita water use, urban water use target, interim urban water use target, and compliance daily per capita water use, along with the bases for determining those estimates, including references to supporting data.

(f) When calculating per capita values for the purposes of this chapter, an urban retail
 water supplier shall determine population using federal, state, and local population reports and projections.

(g) An urban retail water supplier may update its 2020 urban water use target in its 2015 urban water management plan required pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610).

(h) (1) The department, through a public process and in consultation with the California Urban Water Conservation Council, shall develop technical methodologies and criteria for the consistent implementation of this part, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Methodologies for calculating base daily per capita water use, baseline commercial, industrial, and institutional water use, compliance daily per capita water use, gross water use, service area population, indoor residential water use,
 and landscaped area water use.

(B) Criteria for adjustments pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 10608.24.

(2) The department shall post the methodologies and criteria developed pursuant to this subdivision on its internet website, and make written copies available, by October 1, 2010. An urban retail water supplier shall use the methods developed by the department in compliance with this part.

(i) (1) The department shall adopt regulations for implementation of the provisions relating to process water in accordance with Section 10608.12, subdivision (e) of Section 10608.24, and subdivision (d) of Section 10608.26.

(2) The initial adoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision is deemed to address an emergency,
 for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted for that purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. After the initial adoption of an emergency regulation pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall not request approval from the Office of Administrative Law to readopt the regulation as an emergency regulation pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(j) (1) An urban retail water supplier is granted an extension to July 1, 2011, for adoption of an urban water management plan pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) due in 2010 to allow the use of technical methodologies developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) and subdivision (h). An urban retail water supplier that adopts an urban water management plan due in 2010 that does not use the methodologies
 developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (h) shall amend the plan by July 1, 2011, to comply with this part.

(2) An urban wholesale water supplier whose urban water management plan prepared pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) was due and not submitted in 2010 is granted an extension to July 1, 2011, to permit coordination between an urban wholesale water supplier and urban retail water suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 286.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.22.

Notwithstanding the method adopted by an urban retail water supplier pursuant to Section 10608.20, an urban retail water supplier’s per capita daily water use reduction shall be no less than 5 percent of base daily per capita water use as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10608.12. This section does not apply to an urban retail water supplier with a base daily per capita water use at or below 100 gallons per capita per day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 849, Sec. 5.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.24.

(a) Each urban retail water supplier shall meet its interim urban water use target by December 31, 2015.

(b) Each urban retail water supplier shall meet its urban water use target by December 31, 2020.

(c) An urban retail water supplier’s compliance daily per capita water use shall be the measure of progress toward achievement of its urban water use target.

(d) (1) When determining compliance daily per capita water use, an urban retail water supplier may consider the following factors:

(A) Differences in evapotranspiration and rainfall in the baseline period compared to the compliance reporting period.

(B) Substantial changes to commercial or industrial water use resulting from increased business output and economic development that have occurred during the reporting period.

(C) Substantial changes to institutional water use resulting from fire suppression services or other extraordinary events, or from new or expanded operations, that have occurred during the reporting period.

(2) If the urban retail water supplier elects to adjust its estimate of compliance daily per capita water use due to one or more of the factors described in paragraph (1), it shall provide the basis for, and data supporting, the adjustment in the report required by Section 10608.40.

(e) When developing the urban water use target pursuant to Section 10608.20, an urban retail water supplier that has a substantial percentage of industrial water use in its service area may exclude process water from the calculation of gross water use to avoid a disproportionate burden on another customer sector.

(f) (1) An urban retail water supplier that includes agricultural water use in an urban water management plan pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) may include the agricultural water use in determining gross water use. An urban retail water supplier that includes agricultural water use in determining gross water use and develops its urban water use target pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10608.20 shall use a water efficient standard for agricultural irrigation of 100 percent of reference evapotranspiration
 multiplied by the crop coefficient for irrigated acres.

(2) An urban retail water supplier, that is also an agricultural water supplier, is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10608.48), if the agricultural water use is incorporated into its urban water use target pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 234.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)